Nebraska, session 109, LB25.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB25 LB25
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated $5,000,000 from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 to the Department of Administrative Services, for
Program 245, for state aid as described in this section, which shall only
be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$5,000,000 General Funds, which shall be used for providing for
interoperable communication between volunteer departments as defined in
section 35-901 through a grant program. Grants shall be used to provide
mobile radios, programming, and installation of radios and equipment and
shall be made on a one-to-one match for local funds committed to
providing for interoperability. An applicant receiving a grant under this
section shall not be awarded more than $3,500,000.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-